Missouri, session 2026, SB1297.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 407.1095, 407.1098, 407.1101,
407.1104, 407.1107, and 407.1110, RSMo, are repealed and six
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
407.1095, 407.1098, 407.1101, 407.1104, 407.1107, and 407.1110,
to read as follows:
407.1095. As used in sections 407.1095 to 407.1110,
the following words and phrases mean:
(1) "Business subscriber", a business which, primarily
for business use, has subscribed to business telephone
service, wireless service, or similar service;
(2) "Caller identification service", a type of
telephone service which permits telephone subscribers to see
the telephone number of incoming telephone calls;
[(2)] (3) "Residential subscriber", a person who, for
primarily personal and familial use, has subscribed to
residential telephone service, wireless service or similar
service, or the other persons living or residing with such
person;
[(3)] (4) "Telephone solicitation", any voice,
facsimile, short messaging service (SMS), or multimedia
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1297 2
messaging service (MMS), for the purpose of encouraging the
purchase or rental of, or investment in, property, goods or
services, but does not include communications:
(a) To any residential subscriber or business
subscriber with that subscriber's prior express invitation
or permission;
(b) By or on behalf of any person or entity with whom
a residential subscriber or a business subscriber has had a
business contact within the past one hundred eighty days or
a current business or personal relationship;
(c) By or on behalf of an entity organized pursuant to
Chapter 501 (c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue
Code, while such entity is engaged in fund-raising to
support the charitable purpose for which the entity was
established provided that a bona fide member of such exempt
organization makes the voice communication;
(d) By or on behalf of any entity over which a federal
agency has regulatory authority to the extent that:
a. Subject to such authority, the entity is required
to maintain a license, permit or certificate to sell or
provide the merchandise being offered through telemarketing;
and
b. The entity is required by law or rule to develop
and maintain a no-call list;
(e) By a natural person responding to a referral, or
working from his or her primary residence, or a person
licensed by the state of Missouri to carry out a trade,
occupation or profession who is setting or attempting to set
an appointment for actions relating to that licensed trade,
occupation or profession within the state or counties
contiguous to the state.

SB 1297 3
407.1098. No person or entity shall make or cause to
be made any telephone solicitation to any residential
subscriber or any business subscriber in this state who has
given notice to the attorney general, in accordance with
rules promulgated pursuant to section 407.1101 of such
subscriber's objection to receiving telephone solicitations.
407.1101. 1. The attorney general shall establish and
provide for the operation of a database to compile a list of
telephone numbers of residential subscribers and business
subscribers who object to receiving telephone
solicitations. [Such list is not intended to include any
telephone number primarily used for business or commercial
purposes.]
2. The attorney general shall promulgate rules and
regulations governing the establishment of a state no-call
database as he or she deems necessary and appropriate to
fully implement the provisions of sections 407.1095 to
407.1110. The rules and regulations shall include those
which:
(1) Specify the methods by which each residential
subscriber or business subscriber may give notice to the
attorney general or its contractor of his or her objection
to receiving such solicitations or revocation of such
notice. There shall be no cost to the subscriber for
joining the database;
(2) Specify the length of time for which a notice of
objection shall be effective and the effect of a change of
telephone number on such notice;
(3) Specify the methods by which such objections and
revocations shall be collected and added to the database;
(4) Specify the methods by which any person or entity
desiring to make telephone solicitations will obtain access

SB 1297 4
to the database as required to avoid calling the telephone
numbers of residential subscribers or business subscribers
included in the database, including the cost assessed to
that person or entity for access to the database;
(5) Specify such other matters relating to the
database that the attorney general deems desirable.
3. If the Federal Communications Commission
establishes a single national database of telephone numbers
of subscribers who object to receiving telephone
solicitations pursuant to 47 U.S.C. Section 227(c)(3), the
attorney general shall include that part of such single
national database that relates to Missouri in the database
established pursuant to this section.
4. Information contained in the database established
pursuant to this section shall be used only for the purpose
of compliance with section 407.1098 and this section or in a
proceeding or action pursuant to section 407.1107. Such
information shall not be considered a public record pursuant
to chapter 610.
5. In April, July, October and January of each year,
the attorney general shall be encouraged to obtain
subscription listings of residential subscribers and
business subscribers in this state who have arranged to be
included on any national do-not-call list and add those
telephone numbers to the state do-not-call list.
6. The attorney general may utilize moneys
appropriated from general revenue and moneys appropriated
from the merchandising practices revolving fund established
in section 407.140 for the purposes of establishing and
operating the state no-call database.
7. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the

SB 1297 5
authority delegated in sections 407.1095 to 407.1110 shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
the effective date or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2000, shall be invalid and void.
407.1104. 1. Any person or entity who makes a
telephone solicitation to any residential subscriber or
business subscriber in this state shall, at the beginning of
such solicitation, state clearly the identity of the person
or entity initiating the solicitation.
2. No person or entity who makes a telephone
solicitation to a residential subscriber or a business
subscriber in this state shall knowingly use any method to
block or otherwise circumvent any subscriber's use of a
caller identification service.
407.1107. 1. The attorney general may initiate
proceedings relating to a knowing violation or threatened
knowing violation of section 407.1098 or 407.1104. Such
proceedings may include, without limitation, an injunction,
a civil penalty up to a maximum of five thousand dollars for
each knowing violation and additional relief in any court of
competent jurisdiction. The attorney general may issue
investigative demands, issue subpoenas, administer oaths and
conduct hearings in the course of investigating a violation
of section 407.1098 or 407.1104.
2. In addition to the penalties provided in subsection
1 of this section, any person or entity that violates

SB 1297 6
section 407.1104 shall be subject to all penalties, remedies
and procedures provided in sections 407.010 to 407.130. The
remedies available in this section are cumulative and in
addition to any other remedies available by law.
3. Any person or business who has received more than
one telephone solicitation within any twelve-month period by
or on behalf of the same person or entity in violation of
section 407.1098 or 407.1104 may either:
(1) Bring an action to enjoin such violation;
(2) Bring an action to recover for actual monetary
loss from such knowing violation or to receive up to five
thousand dollars in damages for each such knowing violation,
whichever is greater; or
(3) Bring both such actions.
4. It shall be a defense in any action or proceeding
brought pursuant to this section that the defendant has
established and implemented, with due care, reasonable
practices and procedures to effectively prevent telephone
solicitations in violation of section 407.1098 or 407.1104.
5. No action or proceeding may be brought pursuant to
this section:
(1) More than two years after the person or business
bringing the action knew or should have known of the
occurrence of the alleged violation; or
(2) More than two years after the termination of any
proceeding or action arising out of the same violation or
violations by the state of Missouri, whichever is later.
6. A court of this state may exercise personal
jurisdiction over any nonresident or his or her executor or
administrator as to an action or proceeding authorized by
this section in the manner otherwise provided by law.

SB 1297 7
7. The remedies, duties, prohibitions and penalties of
sections 407.1095 to 407.1107 are not exclusive and are in
addition to all other causes of action, remedies and
penalties provided by law.
8. No provider of telephone caller identification
service shall be held liable for violations of section
407.1098 or 407.1104 committed by other persons or entities.
407.1110. The attorney general shall establish an
advisory group composed of government entities, local
telecommunications companies, businesses, and senior citizen
and other community advocates to compile and promote a list
of educational literature to help consumers understand their
options with regard to telephone solicitations. The
attorney general shall work with local exchange
telecommunications companies to disseminate to their
residential subscribers and business subscribers information
about the availability of and instructions about how to
request educational literature from the attorney general.
The attorney general may enter into agreements with those
companies for the purpose of dissemination of the
educational literature. The attorney general shall include
on his or her internet website information that informs
residential subscribers and business subscribers of their
rights to be placed on a no-call list and the various
methods, including notice to the attorney general, of
placing their names on this no-call list. The attorney
general shall have this literature developed for
dissemination to the public no later than January 1, [2001]
2027.
✓